Indiana, session 2026, HB1305.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-2-7-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.201-2023,
SECTION 54, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The inspector general shall do the following:
(1) Initiate, supervise, and coordinate investigations.
(2) Recommend policies and carry out other activities designed to
deter, detect, and eradicate fraud, waste, abuse, mismanagement,
and misconduct in state government.
(3) Receive complaints alleging the following:
(A) A violation of the code of ethics.
(B) Bribery (IC 35-44.1-1-2).
(C) Official misconduct (IC 35-44.1-1-1).
(D) Conflict of interest (IC 35-44.1-1-4).
(E) Profiteering from public service (IC 35-44.1-1-5).
(F) A violation of the executive branch lobbying rules.
(G) A violation of a statute or rule relating to the purchase of
goods or services by a current or former employee, state
officer, special state appointee, lobbyist, or person who has a
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


business relationship with an agency.
(H) A violation of the Indiana grain buyers and warehouse
licensing and bonding law (IC 26-3-7) by the director of the
Indiana grain buyers and warehouse licensing agency.
(4) If the inspector general has reasonable cause to believe that a
crime has occurred or is occurring, report the suspected crime to:
(A) the governor; and
(B) appropriate state or federal law enforcement agencies and
prosecuting authorities having jurisdiction over the matter.
(5) Adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement IC 4-2-6 and this
chapter.
(6) Adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 and section 5 of this chapter to
implement a code of ethics.
(7) Ensure that every:
(A) employee;
(B) state officer;
(C) special state appointee; and
(D) person who has a business relationship with an agency;
is properly trained in the code of ethics.
(8) Provide advice to an agency on developing, implementing,
and enforcing policies and procedures to prevent or reduce the
risk of fraudulent or wrongful acts within the agency.
(9) Provide informal advisory opinions to current, former, and
prospective state employees, state officers, and special state
appointees. An informal advisory opinion issued by the office of
the inspector general is confidential under IC 5-14-3-4, including
any previously issued informal advisory opinion by the office of
the inspector general that recites that it is confidential.
(10) Recommend legislation to the governor and general assembly
to strengthen public integrity laws, including the code of ethics
for state officers, employees, special state appointees, and persons
who have a business relationship with an agency, including
whether additional specific state officers, employees, or special
state appointees should be required to file a financial disclosure
statement under IC 4-2-6-8.
(11) Annually submit a report to the legislative council detailing
the inspector general's activities. The report must be in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(12) Prescribe and provide forms for statements required to be
filed under IC 4-2-6 or this chapter.
(13) Accept and file information that:
(A) is voluntarily supplied; and
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


(B) exceeds the requirements of this chapter.
(14) Inspect financial disclosure forms.
(15) Notify persons who fail to file forms required under IC 4-2-6
or this chapter.
(16) Develop a filing, a coding, and an indexing system required
by IC 4-2-6 and IC 35-44.1-1.
(17) Prepare interpretive and educational materials and programs.
SECTION 2. IC 26-3-7-3, AS AMENDED BY THE TECHNICAL
CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IS
AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]:
Sec. 3. (a) The director may do the following:
(1) Require any reports that are necessary to administer this
chapter.
(2) Administer oaths, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance and
testimony of witnesses, and compel the production of records in
connection with any investigation, informal meeting, or hearing
preliminary meeting, or claims meeting under this chapter.
(3) Prescribe all forms within the provisions of this chapter.
(4) Establish grain standards in accordance with the grain
standards act and federal regulations promulgated under that act
that must be used by warehouses.
(5) Investigate the activities required by this chapter including the
storage, shipping, marketing, and handling of grain and
complaints with respect to the storage, shipping, marketing, and
handling of grain.
(6) Inspect a facility, the grain stored in a facility, and all property
and records pertaining to a facility. All inspections of an applicant
or licensee under this chapter must take into consideration the
proprietary nature of an applicant's or licensee's commercial
information. This chapter does not authorize the inspection of an
applicant's or licensee's trade secret or intellectual property
information.
(7) Determine whether a facility for which a license has been
applied for or has been issued is suitable for the proper storage,
shipping, and handling of the grain that is stored, shipped, or
handled, or is expected to be stored, shipped, or handled.
(8) Require a licensee to terminate storage, shipping, marketing,
and handling agreements upon revocation of a license.
(9) Attend and preside over any investigation, informal meeting,
or hearing preliminary meeting, or claims meeting allowed or
required under this chapter.
(10) Impose sanctions for violations of this article.
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


(11) Require all contracts for the purchase of grain from
producers, except a flat price contract or a contract for the
production of seed, to include the following notice immediately
above the place on the contract where the seller of the grain must
sign:
"NOTICE - SELLER IS CAUTIONED THAT
CONTRACTING FOR THE SALE AND DELIVERY OF
GRAIN INVOLVES RISKS. THESE RISKS MAY INCLUDE
FUTURE PAYMENTS BY YOU TO MAINTAIN THIS
CONTRACT, A LOWER SALES PRICE, AND OTHER
RISKS NOT SPECIFIED. A SELLER MUST CONTACT
THE DIRECTOR OF THE INDIANA GRAIN BUYERS
AND WAREHOUSE LICENSING AGENCY IN
WRITING IF THE FIRST PURCHASER LICENSEE IS
UNABLE TO FULFILL THIS CONTRACT.
INDIANA STATE LAW REQUIRES THAT ALL
DEFERRED PRICED GRAIN MUST BE PRICED WITHIN
THE CROP YEAR AS DEFINED BY IC 26-3-7-2(7).
IC 26-3-7-2(8). THIS CONTRACT MUST BE PRICED BY
_(Insert Date)_.
COVERAGE UNDER THE INDIANA GRAIN INDEMNITY
PROGRAM IS FOR GRAIN THAT HAS BEEN DELIVERED
TO A FIRST PURCHASER LICENSEE WITHIN THE 15
MONTHS BEFORE THE DATE OF THE REVOCATION OF
A LICENSE AND IS LIMITED TO 100% OF A LOSS FOR
STORED GRAIN AND 80% OF A LOSS FOR OTHER
COVERED CONTRACTS.
BE SURE YOU UNDERSTAND THE NATURE OF THIS
CONTRACT AND THE ASSOCIATED RISKS.".
(12) Require all contracts executed for the production of seed to
include the following notice, in conspicuous letters, immediately
above the place on the contract or an addendum where the seller
of the seed must sign:
"NOTICE - IF THE TERMS OF THIS CONTRACT STATE
THAT THE CONTRACTOR RETAINS OWNERSHIP OF
THE SEED AND ITS PRODUCTS, YOU MAY NOT BE
ELIGIBLE FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE INDIANA
GRAIN INDEMNITY PROGRAM. TO BE ELIGIBLE TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE INDIANA GRAIN INDEMNITY
PROGRAM, FARMERS MUST OWN AND SELL GRAIN
OR SEED. BE SURE YOU UNDERSTAND THE NATURE
OF THIS CONTRACT AND THE ASSOCIATED RISKS.".
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


(13) At any time, order an unannounced audit for compliance with
this article.
(14) Require all grain buyers offering deferred pricing, delayed
payments, or contracts linked to the commodity futures or
commodity options market in connection with a grain purchase to
document the agreement in writing not more than twenty-one (21)
days after delivery.
(15) Receive and consider financial audits of a licensee conducted
by an independent audit or accounting firm.
(16) Share information with board members regarding the
financial status of a licensee, while the board is in executive
session and without disclosing the name or any other identifying
information of the licensee, including the following:
(A) Whether there is a risk that a licensee's license may be
revoked.
(B) The financial impact to the fund if a licensee identified in
clause (A) were to have the licensee's license revoked.
(C) The estimated number of potential claimants that could
result from the revocation of a licensee identified in clause
(A).
(D) Any other information the director determines is necessary
to solicit the advice of the board regarding the financial status
of a licensee.
However, the director may not share information under this
subdivision with a board member who has not executed a
confidentiality agreement.
(b) The director shall do the following:
(1) Establish standards to ensure that a grain buyer has a suitable
financial position to conduct a business as a grain buyer.
(2) Require a person who conducts business as a grain buyer to
first be licensed by the agency.
(c) The director may designate an employee to act for the director
in the administration of this chapter. An employee designee may not:
(1) adopt rules; or
(2) act as the ultimate authority in the administration of this
chapter.
(d) The director may designate an administrative law judge to act for
the director in the administration of this chapter.
(e) The director may determine whether geographically separate
facilities constitute a single warehouse or grain buyer and in making
the determination may consider the following:
(1) The number of facilities involved.
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


(2) Whether full weighing equipment is present at the
geographically separate facilities.
(3) The method of bookkeeping employed by the separate
facilities.
(4) The hours of operation of the separate facilities.
(5) The personnel employed at the separate facilities.
(6) Other factors the director deems relevant.
(f) For purposes of determining whether a building or other
protected enclosure constitutes a single warehouse that requires a
single license under this chapter, the director may consider the
following:
(1) The presence of a full weighing facility at geographically
diverse warehouse facilities.
(2) The traditional method of record keeping with respect to the
separate facilities.
(3) The hours, number of personnel, and activities of the separate
facilities.
(4) Any other factor considered relevant.
In the absence of contradictory information, any warehouses owned and
operated by the same person that are located within close proximity of
each other are presumed to constitute a single warehouse.
(g) The director and the director's designated representative shall
become members of the national grain regulatory organization and
shall:
(1) work in partnership with other state grain regulatory officials;
(2) participate in national grain regulatory meetings; and
(3) provide expertise and education at national meetings.
(h) The director shall engage an independent third party firm to
conduct a performance review of the agency's auditing practices and
procedures at least once every five (5) years. The agency shall make
reasonable efforts to implement any corrective measures identified in
the performance review to enhance and improve the agency's auditing
practices and procedures. The agency shall make the findings of the
performance review available to the board.
(i) The director may subpoena or require that certain records located
outside Indiana, if any, be brought to a specified location in Indiana for
review by the agency.
SECTION 3. IC 26-3-7-15.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 15.1. (a) If the agency learns of the possibility that a
shortage exists, either as a result of an inspection or a report or a
complaint from a depositor, the agency shall:
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


(1) conduct an onsite inspection and audit; and
(2) make a preliminary determination as to whether a
shortage exists.
(b) If the agency does not discover a shortage under subsection
(a), the agency must treat the audit as it would any other audit.
(c) If the agency determines that a shortage may exist, the
director or the director's designated representative shall:
(1) hold a preliminary meeting as soon as possible to confirm
the existence of a shortage as indicated by the licensee's books
and records and the grain on hand; and
(2) provide notice of the preliminary meeting to:
(A) the licensee;
(B) the surety company named on the licensee's bond;
(C) the issuer of the irrevocable letter of credit; and
(D) any grain depositor who has made a claim or
complaint to the agency in conjunction with the potential
shortage.
The parties under subdivision (2) are the only interested parties for
purposes of the preliminary meeting.
(d) At the preliminary meeting, the director or the director's
designated representative shall do the following:
(1) Determine whether there is a reasonable probability that
a shortage exists.
(2) If it is determined that a reasonable probability of a
shortage exists and that the bond or letter of credit proceeds
or the cash deposit should be distributed:
(A) enter a preliminary determination that the licensee has
failed to meet its obligations under this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter; and
(B) take possession of the bond or other security required
under this chapter and all proceeds from grain sales are to
be held in the form in which they are received and to be
kept in a separate account from all other funds. The
records of proceeds held in a separate account under this
clause are a public record notwithstanding IC 5-14-3.
(3) Issue an order that provides for an informal meeting,
which may include:
(A) the agency representatives;
(B) persons who have or who appear to have grain
deposited with the licensee; and
(C) the surety company.
(e) If the agency does not begin an audit, which would serve as
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


the basis for a preliminary administrative determination, within
forty-five (45) days after the agency's receipt of a written claim by
a depositor, a depositor has a right of action upon the bond, letter
of credit, or cash deposit. A depositor bringing a civil action under
this subsection need not join other depositors. However, if the
agency has undertaken an audit during the forty-five (45) day
period, the exclusive remedy for recovery against the bond, letter
of credit, or cash deposit is through the recovery procedure
prescribed by sections 15.2 and 15.3 of this chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 26-3-7-15.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 15.2. (a) After conducting a preliminary meeting
under section 15.1 of this chapter, if the director determines that
the bond or letter of credit proceeds or cash deposit is to be
distributed, the agency shall hold a claims meeting.
(b) The agency shall provide notice of the claims meeting
described in subsection (a) to the following:
(1) The surety company named on the licensee's bond.
(2) The issuer of the irrevocable letter of credit.
(3) Any person shown by the licensee's books and records to
have interests in grain deposited with the licensee.
(4) Any other person that the agency has actual knowledge of
claiming rights in the grain deposited with the licensee, the
bond, the irrevocable letter of credit, or the cash deposit.
Additionally, the agency shall provide public notice of the claims
meeting in newspapers of general circulation that serve the
counties in which the licensed facility is located and post notices on
the licensed premises.
(c) At the claims meeting described in subsection (a), the
director or the director's designated representative may accept as
evidence of claims the report of an agency representative who, as
the result of an informal meeting with depositors, has concluded
that a claim is directly and precisely supported by the licensee's
books and records. However, if there is disagreement between a
depositor's claims and the licensee's books and records, the
director or the director's designated representative shall hear oral
claims and receive written evidence of claims to determine the
validity of the claim.
(d) Any depositor who does not present a claim at the claims
meeting described in subsection (a) may bring the claim to the
agency not more than fifteen (15) days after the conclusion of the
claims meeting described in subsection (a). However, a depositor
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


who has a claim that was involved in the probate of an estate at the
time of the claims meeting described in subsection (a) has one (1)
year from the conclusion of the claims meeting described in
subsection (a) to present the claim to the agency.
SECTION 5. IC 26-3-7-15.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 15.3. (a) Following the claims meeting under section
15.2 of this chapter, the director or the director's designated
representative shall make a determination as to the total proven
storage and financial obligations due to depositors and the loss
sustained by each depositor who has proven a claim.
(b) Only grain that has been delivered to a first purchaser
licensee for sale or storage under a bailment not more than fifteen
(15) months before the date of revocation of the licensee's license
may be considered by the director or the director's designated
representative in determining the total proven storage and
financial obligations due to depositors and the loss sustained by
each depositor who has proven a claim. Depositors found to have
proven their claims for storage or financial loss are proven
claimants.
(c) In arriving at that loss, in accordance with section 19 of this
chapter, the director shall apply all grain on hand or its
identifiable proceeds to meet the licensee's obligations to grain
depositors of grain of that type. Initial determinations of loss must
be made on the amount of grain on hand, or identifiable proceeds,
and must reduce the amount to which a depositor may have a
proven claim.
(d) With respect to the remaining unfulfilled obligations, and
subject to subsection (e), the director shall:
(1) for the sole purpose of establishing each depositor's claim
under this chapter, establish a date upon which the loss is
discovered;
(2) price the grain as of the date described in subdivision (1);
(3) treat all outstanding grain storage obligations not covered
by grain on hand or identifiable proceeds as being sold as of
the date described in subdivision (1); and
(4) determine the extent of each depositor's loss as being the
actual loss sustained as of the date described in subdivision
(1).
(e) Grain of a specific type on the premises of a licensee must
first be applied to meet the licensee's storage obligations with
respect to that type of grain. If there is insufficient grain of a
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


specific type on hand to meet all storage obligations with respect to
that type of grain, the grain that is present must be prorated in
accordance with the procedures described in this section and
section 16.8 of this chapter.
(f) The agency shall refer the licensee to the county prosecuting
attorney if the licensee does not have the amount of grain in
storage, at the time of the revocation of the license, that the records
indicate should be in storage.
(g) When the proven claims exceed the amount of the bond,
letter of credit, or cash deposit, recoveries of proven claimants
must be prorated in the same manner as priorities are prorated
under section 16.8 of this chapter.
(h) The proceedings and meetings under this section and
sections 15.1 and 15.2 of this chapter may be undertaken without
regard to, in combination with, or in addition to those undertaken
in accordance with section 17.1 of this chapter.
(i) The findings of the director are final, conclusive, and binding
on all parties.
(j) A claim of a licensee for stored grain may not be honored
until the proven claims of all other claimants arising from the
purchase, storage, and handling of the grain have been paid in full.
(k) A claim is considered to be adjudicated if the claimant has:
(1) agreed with the director's determination on the claim and
not filed an appeal under IC 4-21.5-3; or
(2) exhausted the claimant's administrative appeal and
judicial review remedies.
(l) Subject to the requirements under this chapter, if one (1) or
more claimants are not paid in full for the claimants' proven
claims, the director shall forward to the Indiana grain indemnity
fund board of directors a list of the claimants who are owed money
and the difference between the amount that the claimant was paid
and the amount that the claimant claims to be due along with a
copy of the final order.
SECTION 6. IC 26-3-7-16.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 16.5. (a) Upon learning of the possibility that a shortage
exists, either as a result of an inspection or a report or complaint from
a depositor, the agency, based on an on-premises inspection, shall make
a preliminary determination as to whether a shortage exists. If a
shortage is not discovered, the agency shall treat the audit as it would
any other audit.
(b) If it is determined that a shortage may exist, the director or the
director's designated representative shall hold a hearing as soon as
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


possible to confirm the existence of a shortage as indicated by the
licensee's books and records and the grain on hand. Only the licensee,
the surety company named on the licensee's bond, the issuer of the
irrevocable letter of credit, and any grain depositor who has made a
claim or complaint to the agency in conjunction with the shortage shall
be considered as interested parties for the purposes of that hearing, and
each shall be given notice of the hearing. At the hearing, the director
or the director's designated representative shall determine whether
there appears to be a reasonable probability that a shortage exists. If it
is determined that a reasonable probability exists and that the bond or
letter of credit proceeds or the cash deposit should be distributed, a
preliminary determination shall be entered to the effect that the
licensee has failed to meet its obligations under this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter. At the hearing, the director or the director's
designated representative shall take possession of the bond or other
security required under this chapter and all proceeds from grain sales
are to be held in the form in which they are received and to be kept in
a separate account from all other funds. The order shall also provide for
informal conferences between agency representatives and persons who
have or who appear to have grain deposited with the licensee. The
surety company shall be permitted to participate in those conferences.
(c) In the event that the director determines that the bond or letter
of credit proceeds or cash deposit is to be distributed, the agency shall
hold a hearing on claims. Notice shall be given to the surety company
named on the licensee's bond, the issuer of the irrevocable letter of
credit, and to all persons shown by the licensee's books and records to
have interests in grain deposited with the licensee. If the agency has
actual knowledge of any other depositor or person claiming rights in
the grain deposited with the licensee, the bond, the irrevocable letter of
credit, or the cash deposit, notice shall also be provided to that person.
In addition, public notice shall be provided in newspapers of general
circulation that serve the counties in which licensed facilities are
located, and notices shall be posted on the licensed premises. At the
hearing on claims, the director or the director's designated
representative may accept as evidence of claims the report of agency
representatives who in informal conferences with depositors have
concluded that a claim is directly and precisely supported by the
licensee's books and records. When there is disagreement between the
claims of a depositor and the licensee's books and records, the director
or the director's designated representative shall hear oral claims and
receive written evidence of claims in order to determine the validity of
the claim.
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


(d) Any depositor who does not present a claim at the hearing may
bring the claim to the agency within fifteen (15) days after the
conclusion of the hearing. However, a depositor who has a claim that
was involved in the probate of an estate at the time of the claims
hearing has one (1) year from the conclusion of the claims hearing to
present the claim to the agency.
(e) Only grain that has been delivered to a first purchaser licensee
for sale or storage under a bailment not more than fifteen (15) months
before the date of revocation of the licensee's license may be
considered by the director or the director's designated representative in
determining the total proven storage and financial obligations due to
depositors and the loss sustained by each depositor who has proven a
claim.
(f) Following the hearing on claims, the director or the director's
designated representative shall make a determination as to the total
proven storage and financial obligations due to depositors and the loss
sustained by each depositor who has proven a claim. Depositors found
to have proven their claims for storage or financial loss shall be proven
claimants. In arriving at that loss, in accordance with section 19 of this
chapter, the director shall apply all grain on hand or its identifiable
proceeds to meet the licensee's obligations to grain depositors of grain
of that type. Initial determinations of loss shall be made on the amount
of grain on hand, or identifiable proceeds, and shall reduce the amount
to which a depositor may have a proven claim. With respect to the
remaining unfulfilled obligations, the director shall, for the sole
purpose of establishing each depositor's claim under this chapter,
establish a date upon which the loss is discovered, shall price the grain
as of that date, shall treat all outstanding grain storage obligations not
covered by grain on hand or identifiable proceeds as being sold as of
that date, and shall determine the extent of each depositor's loss as
being the actual loss sustained as of that date. Grain of a specific type
on the premises of a licensee must first be applied to meet the licensee's
storage obligations with respect to that type of grain. If there is
insufficient grain of a specific type on hand to meet all storage
obligations with respect to that type of grain, the grain that is present
shall be prorated in accordance with the procedures described in this
section and section 16.8 of this chapter. The agency shall refer the
licensee to the county prosecuting attorney if the licensee does not have
the amount of grain in storage, at the time of the revocation of the
license, that the records indicate should be in storage.
(g) Upon the failure of the agency to begin an audit, which would
serve as the basis for a preliminary administrative determination,
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


within forty-five (45) days of the agency's receipt of a written claim by
a depositor, a depositor shall have a right of action upon the bond,
letter of credit, or cash deposit. A depositor bringing a civil action need
not join other depositors. If the agency has undertaken an audit within
the forty-five (45) day period, the exclusive remedy for recovery
against the bond, letter of credit, or cash deposit shall be through the
recovery procedure prescribed by this section.
(h) When the proven claims exceed the amount of the bond, letter
of credit, or cash deposit, recoveries of proven claimants shall be
prorated in the same manner as priorities are prorated under section
16.8 of this chapter.
(i) The proceedings and hearings under this section may be
undertaken without regard to, in combination with, or in addition to
those undertaken in accordance with section 17.1 of this chapter.
(j) The findings of the director shall be final, conclusive, and
binding on all parties.
(k) A claim of a licensee for stored grain may not be honored until
the proven claims of all other claimants arising from the purchase,
storage, and handling of the grain have been paid in full.
(l) A claim is considered to be adjudicated if the claimant has:
(1) agreed with the director's determination on the claim and not
filed an appeal under IC 4-21.5-3; or
(2) exhausted the claimant's administrative appeal and judicial
review remedies.
(m) Subject to the requirements under this chapter, if one (1) or
more claimants are not paid in full for the claimants' proven claims, the
director shall forward to the Indiana grain indemnity fund board of
directors a list of the claimants who are owed money and the difference
between the amount that the claimant was paid and the amount that the
claimant claims to be due along with a copy of the final order.
SECTION 7. IC 26-3-7-16.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2025,
SECTION 74, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16.7. (a) A licensee or claimant subject to the
director's action may submit a petition for review and request for
administrative adjudication under IC 4-21.5-3 from orders issued by
the director under section 16.5, 15.1, 15.2, 15.3, or 17.1 of this chapter.
(b) A licensee or claimant may request an administrative
adjudication under IC 4-21.5-3 not more than fifteen (15) days after
being served with the director's findings.
(c) If a licensee or claimant requests an administrative adjudication
under IC 4-21.5-3, the office of administrative law proceedings shall
designate an administrative law judge to preside over the petition for
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


review.
(d) The office of administrative law proceedings is the ultimate
authority for administrative adjudications under IC 4-21.5.
(e) If a claimant submits a petition for review under this section,
the administrative law judge shall award the reasonable attorney's
fees incurred by the claimant, if any.
SECTION 8. IC 26-3-7-17.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.114-2025,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17.1. (a) Whenever the director, as a result of an
inspection or otherwise, has reasonable cause to believe that a person
to which this chapter is or may be applicable:
(1) is conducting business contrary to this chapter or in an
unauthorized manner; or
(2) has failed, neglected, or refused to observe or comply with any
order, rule, or published policy statement of the agency;
then the director may undertake any one (1) of the actions prescribed
by this section.
(b) Upon learning of the possibility that a licensee is acting as
described in subsection (a), the director or the director's designated
representative may seek an informal meeting with the licensee. At that
meeting, which must be held at a time and place agreed to by the
licensee and the director, the director or the director's designated
representative shall discuss the possible violations and may enter into
a consent agreement with the licensee under which the licensee agrees
to undertake, or to cease, the activities that were the subject of the
meeting. The consent agreement must:
(1) provide for a time frame within which the licensee must be in
compliance; and
(2) state in detail the requirements that must be met to be in
compliance, including the requirements under section 31.2(b) of
this chapter.
(c) Upon learning of the possibility that a person is acting as
described in subsection (a), the director or the director's designated
representative, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, shall
hold a hearing an informal meeting to determine whether a cease and
desist order should issue against a licensee or an unlicensed person
undertaking activities covered by this chapter. If the director or the
director's designated representative determines that the violation or the
prohibited practice is likely to cause immediate insolvency or
irreparable harm to depositors, the director or the director's designated
representative, without notice, shall issue a cease and desist order
requiring the person to cease and desist from that violation or practice.
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


The order shall become effective upon service on the person and shall
remain effective and enforceable pending the completion of all
administrative proceedings.
(d) Upon a determination, after a hearing an informal meeting held
by the director or the director's designated representative, that a person
is acting as described in subsection (a), the director shall revoke or
deny a license. If the director revokes or denies a license, the director
shall publish notice of the revocation or denial as provided in section
17.5 of this chapter.
SECTION 9. IC 26-3-7-31.2, AS ADDED BY P.L.114-2025,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 31.2. (a) If the director determines that an
informal meeting under this chapter is necessary or appropriate, the
following procedures apply:
(1) The director shall send a notice of an informal meeting to the
licensee. The notice shall set forth the following:
(A) Each reason underlying the director's determination that an
informal meeting is necessary.
(B) The subject matter to be discussed at the informal meeting.
(C) A place and time mutually agreed upon, within thirty (30)
days of the date of the notice.
(D) If appropriate, any documents, information, or other
materials to be produced in a manner and at a time and place
designated in the notice.
(2) The director and the recipient may, at any time before an
informal meeting, hold a telephone conference or other informal
discussion as necessary to determine the location, date, and time
of the informal meeting.
(3) An informal meeting under this section must be conducted in
person or via a virtual conference with audio, video, and the
ability to share, review, and edit documents or other materials in
real time.
(4) Minutes summarizing the topics and points discussed,
including proposed agreements or remedial actions raised or
discussed by the informal meeting participants, must be taken by
the agency. A copy of the minutes and any other materials from
the informal meeting must be distributed to all participants within
five (5) days of the informal meeting.
(b) A consent agreement may be entered into by the agency and the
licensee in which the licensee agrees to take or refrain from certain
actions in relation to the subject matter of the informal meeting. Any
consent agreement at a minimum must contain the following:
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


(1) Specific description of the underlying facts giving rise to the
consent agreement.
(2) Specific steps to be taken by the licensee to rectify or address
the subject matter of the informal meeting.
(3) Specific deadlines or periods by or within which the licensee
is to act, refrain from acting, or perform under the consent
agreement.
(4) Specific deadlines by which the licensee is to notify the
agency that the licensee has performed, in whole or in part, under
the consent agreement and, as applicable, that the licensee
believes it has addressed the subject matter of the informal
meeting.
(5) Specific acts or omissions that will constitute a breach of the
agreement and specific remedies available to the agency and the
licensee to address a breach of the agreement.
(c) The existence and content of an informal meeting under
subsection (a), along with the minutes of the meeting and any other
related documents, information, or material, and a consent agreement
under subsection (b) is confidential.
(d) Any offers or discussions from an informal hearing meeting
under subsection (a) are protected under the Indiana Trial Rules of
Evidence Trial Rule 408.
SECTION 10. IC 26-4-1-4.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.114-2025,
SECTION 46, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. "Claim" means a claim that has been vetted
through the agency process under IC 26-3-7-16.5 IC 26-3-7-15.2 and
IC 26-3-7-15.3 where the claimant has provided the agency with
documentation of the financial loss the claimant has experienced minus
any payments made to the claimant regarding said loss.
SECTION 11. IC 26-4-6-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.114-2025,
SECTION 74, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A claimant who has incurred a storage loss
due to the revocation of a warehouse operator license under IC 26-3-7
is entitled to be compensated by the board from the fund for one
hundred percent (100%) of the storage loss incurred less all credits and
offsets and any producer premium that would have been due on the sale
of the grain. The gross amount of the storage loss shall be as
determined by the agency for warehouses licensed under IC 26-3-7 or
by the United States Department of Agriculture for warehouses
licensed under the United States Warehouse Act. The warehouse
operator, agency, and claimants may submit to the board evidence
related to outstanding charges against stored grain. If the evidence is
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


submitted, the agency shall determine the storage loss payable by the
board. However, the outstanding charges may not include uncollected
storage charges.
(b) Before a storage loss may be paid, the producer must provide to
the board evidence that storage fees were paid to the facility for the
time during which the grain was stored. The board shall use the
following minimum storage fees to determine the storage loss:
(1) Barley and barley seed: Five cents ($0.05) per month, per
bushel.
(2) Canola and canola seed: Five cents ($0.05) per month, per
bushel.
(3) Corn and corn seed: Five cents ($0.05) per month, per bushel.
(4) Lentils and lentil seed: Five cents ($0.05) per month, per
bushel.
(5) Oats and oat seed: Five cents ($0.05) per month, per bushel.
(6) Popcorn and popcorn seed: Ten cents ($0.10) per month, per
bushel.
(7) Rye and rye seed: Five cents ($0.05) per month, per bushel.
(8) Sorghum and sorghum seed: Five cents ($0.05) per month, per
bushel.
(9) Soybeans and soybean seed: Fifteen cents ($0.15) per month,
per bushel.
(10) Sunflower and sunflower seed: Five cents ($0.05) per month,
per bushel.
(11) Wheat and wheat seed: Five cents ($0.05) per month, per
bushel.
(12) All other field crops and other field crop seed: Five cents
($0.05) per month, per bushel.
(c) A claimant who has incurred a financial loss due to the
revocation of a license of a grain buyer is entitled to be compensated
by the board from the fund for eighty percent (80%) of the loss incurred
less all credits and offsets and any producer premium that should have
been due on the sale of the grain. The board shall determine the loss
incurred in the following manner:
(1) For grain that has been priced, the loss shall be the value of
the priced grain less any outstanding charges against the grain.
(2) For grain sold to a grain buyer, where the title to the grain has
passed to the grain buyer, who is also a warehouse operator and
that has not been priced, the loss shall be established using the
price determined for the storage obligations.
(3) For grain sold to a grain buyer who is not a warehouse
operator and that has not been priced, the loss shall be established
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148


using a price determined by the agency using the same procedures
used by the agency to determine the price at the warehouse.
(d) If a producer appeals under IC 4-21.5-3 an order issued by the
director under IC 26-3-7-16.5 IC 26-3-7-15.1, IC 26-3-7-15.2, or
IC 26-3-7-15.3 that postpones the agency from notifying the board of
the amount of loss for proven claimants under IC 26-3-7-16.5(m),
IC 26-3-7-15.3(l), the board may issue partial payments to any
claimants who have not appealed their claims.
2026 IN 1305—LS 6988/DI 148